Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1
PUBLIC ENFORCEMENT

35-31-101. Destruction of food prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation or any servant, agent, employee, or officer thereof to destroy or cause to be destroyed, or to permit to decay or to become unfit for use or consumption, or to take, send, or cause to be transported out of this state so to be destroyed or permitted to decay, or knowingly to make any materially false statement, for the purpose of maintaining prices or establishing higher prices for the same, or for the purpose of limiting or diminishing the quantity thereof available for market, or for the purpose of procuring, or aiding in procuring, or establishing, or maintaining a monopoly in such articles or products, or for the purpose of in any manner restraining trade, any fruits, vegetables, grain, meats, or other articles or products ordinarily grown, raised, produced, or used in any manner or to any extent as food for human beings or for domestic animals.

Source:

L. 17:

Ex. Sess., p. 39, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3692.

CSA:

C. 69, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 7-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-2-1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 965, § 1, effective July 1.

35-31-102. Applicable to unmatured foods.

This part 1 shall apply to the destruction of unripe or unmatured food products or articles as well as to the destruction of the same when matured or ready for marketing.

Source:

L. 17:

Ex. Sess., p. 39, § 2.

C.L.

§ 3693.

CSA:

C. 69, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 7-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-2-2.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 237, § 2, effective April 12.

35-31-103. Evidence.

Evidence of the voluntary destruction or of the destruction, if unexplained, of any of the food products or articles mentioned in section 35-31-101, or of the voluntary and willful permitting of the same to decay, or of the taking, sending, or causing of the same to be transported out of this state to be destroyed or permitted to decay shall be prima facie proof of the violation of this part 1.

Source:

L. 17:

Ex. Sess., p. 40, § 3.

C.L.

§ 3694.

CSA:

C. 69, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 7-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-2-3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 237, § 3, effective April 12.

35-31-104. Penalty.

Any person, whether acting individually or otherwise, in such person's own behalf, or as the agent, employee, servant, director, or officer of any other person, partnership, firm, association, or corporation, or any corporation who violates any of the provisions of this part 1 commits a petty offense.

As a condition of any sentence imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall order in addition to any other penalty that any person convicted of a violation of this part 1 shall make restitution to any victim of such a violation. The amount and any conditions of such a restitution order shall be determined in the same manner as a restitution order imposed pursuant to the provisions of section 18-1.3-205, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 17:

Ex. Sess., p. 40, § 4.

C.L.

§ 3695.

CSA:

C. 69, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 7-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-2-4.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 965, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 237, § 4, effective April 12; (2) amended, p. 1548, § 313, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3279, § 629, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) by House Bill 02-1046 and Senate Bill 02-069 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-31-105. Enforcement.

It is the duty of the district attorneys in their respective districts and of the attorney general to enforce the provisions of this part 1. It is the duty of all citizens of this state who have knowledge or information of a violation of this part 1 to at once inform against anyone who may have violated the same.

Source:

L. 17:

Ex. Sess., p. 40, § 5.

C.L.

§ 3696.

CSA:

C. 69, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 7-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-2-5.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 238, § 5, effective April 12.

35-31-106. Liberal construction.

This part 1 shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose of preventing waste and of conserving and protecting the food supply available to the people of the state, to the end that the people may enjoy the benefit of any abundance or oversupply of any such food articles or products that may from time to time arise in any locality or in the state at large.

Source:

L. 17:

Ex. Sess., p. 40, § 6.

C.L.

§ 3697.

CSA:

C. 69, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 7-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-2-6.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 238, § 6, effective April 12.